Utah statutes.
10-6-102.   Legislative intent -- Purpose of chapter.
This chapter is intended to provide uniform accounting, budgeting, and
financial reporting procedures for cities. It is the purpose of this chapter
to enable cities to make financial plans for both current and capital
expenditures, to insure that their executive staffs administer their
respective functions in accordance with adopted budgets, to provide the public
and investors with information about the financial policies and administration
of cities, to provide for the optional use of performance budgeting and
related accounting and reporting procedures, and to enable larger cities to
evaluate and measure operating performance and provide data comparable with
other cities.
